Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of automobile insurance provision or statute automatically terminating coverage when insured obtains another policy providing similar coverage, 61 ALR4th 1130.

§ 26-35-101.
Manner of providing notice.

Notices required by this chapter shall be personally delivered to the insured and the agent or shall be mailed to the insured and the agent at their addresses last of record with the insured. If mailed, notice shall be deemed given when deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. Proof of mailing shall be sufficient proof of notice.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes waiver by insured or insured's agent of required notice of cancellation of insurance policy, 86 ALR4th 886.

§ 26-35-102.
Refund of unearned premium upon cancellation.

Any insurer who cancels a policy of insurance in accordance with this chapter shall, prior to cancellation, refund any unearned premium to the policyholder.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 26-35-103.
Prohibited practices.

It is unlawful for any insurer to cancel, nonrenew or renew a policy of insurance except in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

Mid-term cancellation of an entire block, line or class of business is presumed to be unfair, inequitable, deceptive, contrary to the public interest or a method and practice rendering the further transaction of insurance in this state injurious to policyholders or to the public and is hereby declared to be unlawful.

If a policy has been issued for a term longer than one (1) year, and for additional premium consideration an annual premium has been guaranteed, it shall be unlawful for the insurer to increase that annual premium during the term of that policy.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 26-35-104.
Penalties.

Any insurer who violates this chapter is subject to monetary penalties or license revocation or suspension as provided in W.S.

26-1-107

and

26-3-116

.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 26-35-105.
Issuance or renewal with exclusions.

An insurer may in lieu of nonissuance, cancellation, nonrenewal or premium increase offer to issue, continue or renew a motor vehicle insurance policy but to exclude from coverage, by name, the person whose claim experience or driving record would have justified the nonissuance, premium increase, cancellation or nonrenewal.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 106, § 1.

§ 26-35-106.
Transfers of policies resulting from mergers, acquisitions or restructuring or resulting in broader coverage; notice not required.

Subject to the provisions of W.S.

26-35-204

, a nonrenewal or cancellation notice shall not be required if a policy is transferred from an insurer to an affiliated insurer under common management and control:

As a result of a merger, acquisition or company restructuring; or

If the transfer results in the same or broader coverage.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the right of an insured to cancel a policy.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 176, § 1.